Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 8
OUTCOME-BASED SUPPORTED EMPLOYMENT SYSTEM
FOR INTEGRATED EMPLOYMENT SERVICES
FOR PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES, INCLUDING
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES

27-10.5-801. Pilot program - creation - goals - implementation - reporting - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 378, § 2, effective April 10.

L. 2015:

(4) added by revision, (SB 15-239), ch. 160, pp. 488, 490 §§ 7, 14.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2016. (See L. 2015, pp. 488, 490.)